Maryland, session 2025, HB0869.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
15–141.2.
(a) (7) (i) “Telehealth” means the delivery of medically necessary somatic,
dental, or behavioral health services to a patient at an originating site by a distant site
provider through the use of technology–assisted communication.

HOUSE BILL 869 3
(ii) “Telehealth” includes:
1. Synchronous and asynchronous interactions;
2. [From July 1, 2021, to June 30, 2025, both inclusive, an]
AN audio–only telephone conversation between a health care provider and a patient that
results in the delivery of a billable, covered health care service; and
3. Remote patient monitoring services.
(iii) “Telehealth” does not include the provision of health care
services solely through:
1. Except as provided in subparagraph (ii)2 of this
paragraph, an audio–only telephone conversation;
2. An e–mail message; or
3. A facsimile transmission.
(g) (1) Subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, the Program shall
reimburse a health care provider for the diagnosis, consultation, and treatment of a
Program recipient for a health care service covered by the Program that can be
appropriately provided through telehealth.
(2) This subsection does not require the Program to reimburse a health
care provider for a health care service delivered in person or through telehealth that is:
(i) Not a covered health care service under the Program; or
(ii) Delivered by an out–of–network provider unless the health care
service is a self–referred service authorized under the Program.
(3) (i) [From July 1, 2021, to June 30, 2025, both inclusive, when]
WHEN appropriately provided through telehealth, the Program shall provide
reimbursement in accordance with paragraph (1) of this subsection on the same basis and
the same rate as if the health care service were delivered by the health care provider in
person.
(ii) The reimbursement required under subparagraph (i) of this
paragraph does not include:
1. Clinic facility fees unless the health care service is
provided by a health care provider not authorized to bill a professional fee separately for
the health care service; or

HOUSE BILL 869
2. Any room and board fees.
19–108.6.
ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1 EVERY 4 YEARS, BEGINNING IN 2026, THE
COMMISSION SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE
WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
THAT INCLUDES:
(1) ADVANCES OR DEVELOPMENTS IN THE AREA OF TELEHEALTH,
INCLUDING:
(I) EVOLVING MODALITIES OF TELEHEALTH DELIVERY; AND
(II) CHANGES IN THE COSTS OF DELIVERING TELEHEALTH
SERVICES; AND
(2) ANY FINDINGS OR RECOMMENDATIONS OF THE COMMISSION.
Article – Health Occupations
1–1003.
(a) A health care practitioner providing telehealth services shall:
(1) Be held to the same standards of practice that are applicable to
in–person health care settings; and
(2) If clinically appropriate for the patient, provide or refer a patient to
in–person health care services or another type of telehealth service.
(b) (1) A health care practitioner shall perform a clinical evaluation that is
appropriate for the patient and the condition with which the patient presents before
providing treatment or issuing a prescription through telehealth.
(2) A health care practitioner may use a synchronous telehealth interaction
or an asynchronous telehealth interaction to perform the clinical evaluation required under
paragraph (1) of this subsection.
(c) [(1) A health care practitioner may not prescribe an opiate described in the
list of Schedule II substances under § 5–403 of the Criminal Law Article for the treatment
of pain through telehealth, unless:
(i) The individual receiving the prescription is a patient in a health
care facility, as defined in § 19–114 of the Health – General Article; or

HOUSE BILL 869 5
(ii) The Governor has declared a state of emergency due to a
catastrophic health emergency; OR
(III) THERE IS AN ESTABLISHED BONA FIDE
PRACTITIONER–PATIENT RELATIONSHIP IN WHICH THE HEALTH CARE
PRACTITIONER HAS ONGOING RESPONSIBILITY FOR THE ASSESSMENT, CARE, AND
TREATMENT OF THE PATIENT AND THE HEALTH CARE PRACTITIONER, OR ANOTHER
HEALTH CARE PRACTITIONER IN THE SAME GROUP PRACTICE, PREVIOUSLY
CONDUCTED AN IN–PERSON ASSESSMENT OF THE PATIENT.
(2) Subject to paragraph (1) of this subsection, a] A health care practitioner
who through telehealth prescribes a controlled dangerous substance, as defined in § 5–101
of the Criminal Law Article, is subject to any applicable regulation, limitation, and
prohibition in federal and State law relating to the prescription of controlled dangerous
substances.
Article – Insurance
15–139.
(a) (1) In this section, “telehealth” means, as it relates to the delivery of health
care services, the use of interactive audio, video, or other telecommunications or electronic
technology by a licensed health care provider to deliver a health care service within the
scope of practice of the health care provider at a location other than the location of the
patient.
(2) “Telehealth” includes [from July 1, 2021, to June 30, 2025, both
inclusive,] an audio–only telephone conversation between a health care provider and a
patient that results in the delivery of a billable, covered health care service.
(3) “Telehealth” does not include:
(i) except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, an
audio–only telephone conversation between a health care provider and a patient;
(ii) an electronic mail message between a health care provider and a
patient; or
(iii) a facsimile transmission between a health care provider and a
patient.
(b) This section applies to:
(1) insurers and nonprofit health service plans that provide hospital,
medical, or surgical benefits to individuals or groups on an expense–incurred basis under
health insurance policies or contracts that are issued or delivered in the State; and

HOUSE BILL 869
(2) health maintenance organizations that provide hospital, medical, or
surgical benefits to individuals or groups under contracts that are issued or delivered in
the State.
(c) (1) An entity subject to this section:
(i) shall provide coverage under a health insurance policy or
contract for health care services appropriately delivered through telehealth regardless of
the location of the patient at the time the telehealth services are provided;
(ii) may not exclude from coverage a health care service solely
because it is provided through telehealth and is not provided through an in–person
consultation or contact between a health care provider and a patient; and
(iii) may not exclude from coverage or deny coverage for a behavioral
health care service that is a covered benefit under a health insurance policy or contract
when provided in person solely because the behavioral health care service may also be
provided through a covered telehealth benefit.
(2) The health care services appropriately delivered through telehealth
shall include counseling and treatment for substance use disorders and mental health
conditions.
(d) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, an entity subject to this
section:
(i) shall reimburse a health care provider for the diagnosis,
consultation, and treatment of an insured patient for a health care service covered under a
health insurance policy or contract that can be appropriately provided through telehealth;
(ii) is not required to:
1. reimburse a health care provider for a health care service
delivered in person or through telehealth that is not a covered benefit under the health
insurance policy or contract; or
2. reimburse a health care provider who is not a covered
provider under the health insurance policy or contract; and
(iii) 1. may impose a deductible, copayment, or coinsurance
amount on benefits for health care services that are delivered either through an in–person
consultation or through telehealth;
2. may impose an annual dollar maximum as permitted by
federal law; and

HOUSE BILL 869 7
3. may not impose a lifetime dollar maximum.
(2) (i) [From July 1, 2021, to June 30, 2025, both inclusive, when]
WHEN a health care service is appropriately provided through telehealth, an entity subject
to this section shall provide reimbursement in accordance with paragraph (1)(i) of this
subsection on the same basis and at the same rate as if the health care service were
delivered by the health care provider in person.
(ii) The reimbursement required under subparagraph (i) of this
paragraph does not include:
1. clinic facility fees unless the health care service is
provided by a health care provider not authorized to bill a professional fee separately for
the health care service; or
2. any room and board fees.
(iii) This paragraph may not be construed to supersede the authority
of the Health Services Cost Review Commission to set the appropriate rates for hospitals,
including setting the hospital facility fee for hospital–provided telehealth.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
June 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.